North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36C. North Carolina Uniform Trust Code.
Article 3. Representation.

General Comment

This article deals with representation of beneficiaries, both representation by fiduciaries (personal representatives, trustees, guardians, and conservators), and what is known as virtual representation. Representation is a topic not adequately addressed under the trust law of most States. Representation is addressed in the Restatement (First) of Property §§ 180-186 (1936), but the coverage of this article is more complete.

Section 301 is the introductory section, laying out the scope of the article. The representation principles of this article have numerous applications under this Code. The representation principles of the article apply for purposes of settlement of disputes, whether by a court or nonjudicially. They apply for the giving of required notices. They apply for the giving of consents to certain actions.

Sections 302-305 cover the different types of representation. Section 302 deals with representation by the holder of a general testamentary power of appointment. (Revocable trusts and presently exercisable general powers of appointment are covered by Section 603, which grant the settlor or holder of the power all rights of the beneficiaries or persons whose interests are subject to the power). Section 303 deals with representation by a fiduciary, whether of an estate, trust, conservatorship, or guardianship. The section also allows a parent without a conflict of interest to represent and bind a minor or unborn child. Section 304 is the virtual representation provision. It provides for representation of and the giving of a binding consent by another person having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular issue. Section 305 authorizes the court to appoint a representative to represent the interests of unrepresented persons or persons for whom the court concludes the other available representation might be inadequate.

The provisions of this article are subject to modification in the terms of the trust.
See
Section 105. Settlors are free to specify their own methods for providing substituted notice and obtaining substituted consent.

North Carolina General Comment

This Article is generally consistent with the provisions in former G.S. 36A-26.3 of the Trust Administration Act regarding representation of parties in trust proceedings before the clerk of superior court with variations to be noted in the North Carolina Comments to the sections of this Article. However, unlike prior law the representation principles of this Article apply not only to the trust proceedings before the clerk but also to such proceedings before the superior court division of the general court of justice, as well as to giving of required notices and consents under this Chapter.

§ 36C-3-301.
Representation: basic effect.

Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this Article has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this Article is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

Except as otherwise provided in

G.S. 36C-4-411

and

G.S. 36C-6-602

, a person who under this Article may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor’s behalf.

A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this Article with respect to the termination or modification of trust under

G.S. 36C-4-411(a)

.

History.

2005-192, s. 2.

§ 36C-3-302.
Representation by holder of power of revocation or general power of appointment.

The sole holder or all coholders of a power of revocation or a presently exercisable or testamentary general power of appointment, including one in the form of a power of amendment, shall represent and bind other persons to the extent that their interests, as takers in default, are subject to the power.

History.

2005-192, s. 2; 2009-222, s. 2; 2010-96, s. 8.

§ 36C-3-303.
Representation by fiduciaries, parents, and other persons.

To the extent that there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute involving a trust:

A general guardian or a guardian of the estate may represent and bind the estate that the guardian controls.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-106, s. 11, effective October 1, 2007.

An agent under a power of attorney having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal.

A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust unless the question or dispute involves the internal affairs of the trust.

A personal representative of a decedent’s estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate.

A parent may represent and bind the parent’s minor child if a general guardian or guardian of the estate for the child has not been appointed. If a disagreement arises between parents seeking to represent the same minor child, the parent who is a beneficiary of the trust that is the subject of the representation is entitled to represent the minor child or, if no parent is a beneficiary of the trust that is the subject of the representation, a parent who is a lineal descendant of the settlor is entitled to represent the minor child, or if no parent is a lineal descendant of the settlor, a guardian ad litem shall be appointed to represent the minor child.

A person may represent and bind that person’s unborn issue.

History.

2005-192, s. 2; 2007-106, s. 11.

§ 36C-3-304.
Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

Unless otherwise represented under this Article, a minor, an incompetent or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent that there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented with respect to the particular question or dispute.

History.

2005-192, s. 2; 2007-106, s. 12.

§ 36C-3-305.
Appointment of representative; scope of representation.

If the court determines that an interest is not represented under this Article, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to receive notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a minor, an incompetent or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown. A guardian ad litem may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

Any representative under this Article may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this Chapter, whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.

In making decisions, a representative, including a guardian ad litem, may base a decision to consent to an action upon a finding that living members of the individual’s family would generally benefit from that action.

History.

2005-192, s. 2; 2007-106, s. 13.